Utah statutes.
31A-10-201.   Definition.
As used in this part:
(1)  "Nontraditional  insurer" means an insurer incorporated under Chapter 5,
Domestic Stock and Mutual Insurance Corporations, or admitted under Chapter
14, Foreign Insurers, that:
(a)  exists for the purpose of aiding and strengthening the following by
providing them with annuities:
(i)  nonprofit entities;
(ii)  employees of nonprofit entities;
(iii)  governmental entities; and
(iv)  employees of governmental entities;
(b)  issues only annuities and no other insurance product; and
(c)  does not pay any benefit based on a guarantee as to principal, interest
rate, return on investment, mortality, and morbidity.
(2)  "Nontraditional insurer" does not include an insurer that provides
annuities to persons other than:
(a)  nonprofit entities;
(b)  employees of nonprofit entities;
(c)  governmental entities; and
(d)  employees of governmental entities.
